Colorado, session 2026A, HB1197.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 24-34-104, repeal
(27)(a)(IV); and add (37)(a)(III) as follows:
24-34-104. General assembly review of regulatory agencies and
functions for repeal, continuation, or reestablishment - legislative
declaration - repeal.
(27) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2026:
(IV) The registration and regulation of vessels by the department of
natural resources in accordance with article 13 of title 33, C.R.S.;
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

(37) (a) The following agencies, functions, or both, are scheduled
for repeal on September 1, 2036:
(III) THE REGISTRATION AND REGULATION OF VESSELS BY THE
DEPARTMENT OF NATURAL RESOURCES IN ACCORDANCE WITH ARTICLE 13 OF
TITLE 33.
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 33-13-116 as
follows:
33-13-116. Repeal of sections.
Sections 33-13-103, 33-13-104, 33-13-105, and 33-13-107 and this
section are repealed, effective September 1, 2026 SEPTEMBER 1, 2036. Prior
to the repeal, the function of registration and regulation of vessels shall be
reviewed as provided for in section 24-34-104.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-13-102, amend (5);
and add (5.3) as follows:
33-13-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 13, unless the context otherwise requires:
(5) (a) "Vessel" means every description of watercraft TYPE OF
WATERCRAFT, EXCEPT A SEAPLANE ON THE WATER, used or capable of being
used as a means of transportation of persons and property on the water,
including all types of stand-up paddleboards BUT DOES NOT INCLUDE
FISHING AIDS, AIR MATTRESSES, BEACH AND WATER TOYS, OR INNER TUBES.
(b) "Vessel" does not include:
(I) Any single-chambered, air-inflated devices that are not stand-up
paddleboards; or
(II) Seaplanes.
(5.3) "VESSEL LIVERY" MEANS A PERSON THAT ADVERTISES AND
OFFERS A VESSEL FOR RENT OR LEASE TO ANOTHER PERSON IN EXCHANGE
FOR ANY KIND OF PAYMENT.
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1197

SECTION 4. In Colorado Revised Statutes, amend 33-13-107 as
follows:
33-13-107. Vessel liveries - repeal.
(1) The owner or operator of A vessel livery shall keep a record of
the name and address of each person who THAT hires any vessel that is
designed or permitted to be operated as a vessel, the hull identification
number of the vessel, and the departure date and time and the expected date
and time of return of the vessel. Such records shall be preserved for at least
thirty days THREE YEARS after the vessel is to be returned and shall be ARE
subject to inspection by the division. Any person who THAT violates this
subsection (1) commits a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be
punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.
(2) Neither the owner nor operator of A vessel livery nor such
owner's or operator's OR THE VESSEL LIVERY'S agent or employee shall NOT
permit any vessel to depart from his or her THE VESSEL LIVERY'S premises
unless such vessel is equipped and registered as required by this article 13
and rules promulgated ADOPTED pursuant to this article 13. Any person who
THAT violates this subsection (2) commits a civil infraction and, upon
conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one hundred dollars.
SECTION 5. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-17-107.1, amend
(4) and (5) as follows:
33-13-107.1. Minimum age of motorboat operators - penalty -
exception.
(4) Neither an owner or operator of A vessel livery nor OR an agent
or employee of such owner or operator THE VESSEL LIVERY shall NOT lease,
hire, or rent a motorboat to or for operation by any individual under
eighteen years of age YEARS OLD; except that an individual fourteen years
of age YEARS OLD or older who has not reached the individual's eighteenth
birthday may be permitted or authorized to operate a motorboat if the
individual has met the boating safety and certificate requirements of
subsection (2) of this section.
(5) Any individual who PERSON THAT violates this section commits
a civil infraction and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of one
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1197

hundred dollars.
SECTION 6. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 33-32-102, amend (8)
as follows:
33-32-102. Definitions.
As used in this article 32, unless the context otherwise requires:
(8) (a) "Vessel" means every description of watercraft TYPE OF
WATERCRAFT, EXCEPT A SEAPLANE ON THE WATER, used or capable of being
used as a means of transportation of persons and property on the water,
including all types of stand-up paddleboards BUT DOES NOT INCLUDE
FISHING AIDS, AIR MATTRESSES, BEACH AND WATER TOYS, OR INNER TUBES.
(b) "Vessel" does not include:
(I) Any single-chambered, air-inflated devices that are not stand-up
paddleboards; or
(II) Seaplanes.
SECTION 7. Act subject to petition - effective date applicability.
(1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following the expiration
of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the general assembly
(August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13, 2026); except that,
if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the
state constitution against this act or an item, section, or part of this act
within such period, then the act, item, section, or part will not take effect
unless approved by the people at the general election to be held in
November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the date of the official
declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1197

(2) This act applies to conduct occurring on or after the applicable
effective date of this act.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1197